Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-563
Nuisance birds; commission; powers.

The commission may adopt, promulgate, and publish rules and regulations for the control of individual nuisance birds or populations of such birds to reduce or avert depredation upon ornamental or shade trees, agricultural crops, livestock, or wildlife or when concentrated in such numbers and manner as to constitute a health hazard or other nuisance. Such rules and regulations shall specify the species which may be controlled, the circumstances under which control is to be permitted, and the control methods which may be employed.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 283.